apertium-ckb.ckb.dix
    <pardef n="چ__vblex">
      <e><p><l>م</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>یت</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ێت</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ێ</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ین</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="چ_ەوە__vblex">
      <e><p><l>مەوە</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>یتەوە</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ێتەوە</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ینەوە</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>نەوە</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>نەوە</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="گەڕ__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ێم</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>یێت</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ێی</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ێت</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ێ</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ێین</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ێن</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ێن</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ک__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ەم</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ەیت</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ات</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ەی</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ا</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ەین</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ەن</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ەن</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ک_ەوە__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ەمەوە</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ەیتەوە</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>اتەوە</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ەینەوە</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ەنەوە</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ەنەوە</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="گەڕ_ەوە__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ێمەوە</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ێیتەوە</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ێتەوە</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ێینەوە</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ێنەوە</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ێنەوە</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="خ_ۆ__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ۆم</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ۆیت</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ۆی</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>وات</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>وا</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ۆین</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ۆن</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ۆن</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="خ_ۆ_ەوە__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ۆمەوە</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ۆیتەوە</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>واتەوە</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ۆینەوە</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ۆنەوە</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ۆنەوە</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Present Indicative -->

    <pardef n="دەگەڕ__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="گەڕ__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="دەخ_ۆ__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="خ_ۆ__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="دەخ_ۆ_ەوە__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="خ_ۆ_ەوە__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="دەچ__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="چ__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="دەک__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="ک__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="دەک_ەوە__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="ک_ەوە__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="دەگەڕ_ەوە__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="گەڕ_ەوە__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Subjunctives -->
    <pardef n="بخ_ۆ__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="خ_ۆ__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="بخ_ۆ_ەوە__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="خ_ۆ_ەوە__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="بگەڕ__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="گەڕ__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="بچ__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="چ__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="بک__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="ک__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="بک_ەوە__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="ک_ەوە__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="بگەڕ_ەوە__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="گەڕ_ەوە__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Past -->

    <!-- pri: Transitivity, Polarity -->

    <pardef n="دەخ_ۆ__vblex_tv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="دەخ_ۆ__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="نەدەخ_ۆ__vblex_tv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="دەخ_ۆ__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="دەخ_ۆ_ەوە__vblex_tv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="دەخ_ۆ_ەوە__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="نەدەخ_ۆ_ەوە__vblex_tv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="دەخ_ۆ_ەوە__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="دەر_ۆ__vblex_iv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="دەخ_ۆ__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="نەدەر_ۆ__vblex_iv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="دەخ_ۆ__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="دەر_ۆ_ەوە__vblex_iv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="دەخ_ۆ_ەوە__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="نەدەر_ۆ_ەوە__vblex_iv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="دەخ_ۆ_ەوە__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="بش_ۆ__vblex_iv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="بخ_ۆ__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="نەش_ۆ__vblex_iv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="بخ_ۆ__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="دەش_ۆ__vblex_iv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="دەخ_ۆ__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="نەدەش_ۆ__vblex_iv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="دەخ_ۆ__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="دەش_ۆ_ەوە__vblex_iv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="دەخ_ۆ_ەوە__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="نەدەش_ۆ_ەوە__vblex_iv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="دەخ_ۆ_ەوە__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>



    <pardef n="دەچ__vblex_iv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="دەچ__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="نەدەچ__vblex_iv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="دەچ__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="دەنووس__vblex_tv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="دەچ__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="نەدەنووس__vblex_tv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="دەچ__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="چوون"><p><l>دەچ</l><r>چوون</r></p><par n="دەچ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="چوون"><p><l>نەدەچ</l><r>چوون</r></p><par n="نەدەچ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="چوون" r="LR" c="Sulaymani"><p><l>ناچ</l><r>چوون</r></p><par n="نەدەچ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="نووسين"><p><l>نەدەنووس</l><r>نووسين</r></p><par n="نەدەنووس__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="نووسين"  r="LR" c="Sulaymani"><p><l>نانووس</l><r>نووسين</r></p><par n="نەدەنووس__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="نووسين"><p><l>دەنووس</l><r>نووسين</r></p><par n="دەنووس__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="گرتن"><p><l>نەدەگر</l><r>گرتن</r></p><par n="نەدەنووس__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="گرتن"  r="LR" c="Sulaymani"><p><l>ناگر</l><r>گرتن</r></p><par n="نەدەنووس__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="گرتن"><p><l>دەگر</l><r>گرتن</r></p><par n="دەنووس__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="کڕین"><p><l>نەدەکڕ</l><r>کڕین</r></p><par n="نەدەنووس__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="کڕین"  r="LR" c="Sulaymani"><p><l>ناکڕ</l><r>کڕین</r></p><par n="نەدەنووس__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="کڕین"><p><l>دەکڕ</l><r>کڕین</r></p><par n="دەنووس__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="زانن"><p><l>نەدەزان</l><r>زانن</r></p><par n="نەدەنووس__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="زانن" r="LR" c="Sulaymani"><p><l>ئەزان</l><r>زانن</r></p><par n="دەنووس__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="زانن" r="LR" c="Sulaymani"><p><l>نازان</l><r>زانن</r></p><par n="نەدەنووس__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="زانن"><p><l>دەزان</l><r>زانن</r></p><par n="دەنووس__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="شتن"><p><l>نەش</l><r>شتن</r></p><par n="نەش_ۆ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="شتن"><p><l>نەدەش</l><r>شتن</r></p><par n="نەدەش_ۆ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="شتن"  r="LR" c="Sulaymani"><p><l>ناش</l><r>شتن</r></p><par n="نەدەش_ۆ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="شتن"><p><l>دەش</l><r>شتن</r></p><par n="دەش_ۆ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="شتن"><p><l>بش</l><r>شتن</r></p><par n="بش_ۆ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="خواردن"><p><l>نەدەخ</l><r>خواردن</r></p><par n="نەدەخ_ۆ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="خواردن"  r="LR" c="Sulaymani"><p><l>ناخ</l><r>خواردن</r></p><par n="نەدەخ_ۆ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="خواردن" r="LR" c="Sulaymani"><p><l>ناخ</l><r>خواردن</r></p><par n="نەدەخ_ۆ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="خواردن"><p><l>دەخ</l><r>خواردن</r></p><par n="دەخ_ۆ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="خواردنەوە"><p><l>نەدەخ</l><r>خواردنەوە</r></p><par n="نەدەخ_ۆ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="خواردنەوە"  r="LR" c="Sulaymani"><p><l>ناخ</l><r>خواردنەوە</r></p><par n="نەدەخ_ۆ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="خواردنەوە" r="LR" c="Sulaymani"><p><l>ناخ</l><r>خواردنەوە</r></p><par n="نەدەخ_ۆ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="خواردنەوە"><p><l>دەخ</l><r>خواردنەوە</r></p><par n="دەخ_ۆ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="خواردنەوە"><p><l>نەدەخ</l><r>خواردنەوە</r></p><par n="نەدەخ_ۆ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="خواردنەوە"  r="LR" c="Sulaymani"><p><l>ناخ</l><r>خواردنەوە</r></p><par n="نەدەخ_ۆ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="خواردنەوە" r="LR" c="Sulaymani"><p><l>ناخ</l><r>خواردنەوە</r></p><par n="نەدەخ_ۆ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="خواردنەوە"><p><l>دەخ</l><r>خواردنەوە</r></p><par n="دەخ_ۆ__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="رۆیشتن"><p><l>نەدەر</l><r>رۆیشتن</r></p><par n="نەدەر_ۆ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="رۆیشتن"  r="LR" c="Sulaymani"><p><l>نار</l><r>رۆیشتن</r></p><par n="نەدەر_ۆ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="رۆیشتن" r="LR" c="Sulaymani"><p><l>نار</l><r>رۆیشتن</r></p><par n="نەدەر_ۆ__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="رۆیشتن"><p><l>دەر</l><r>رۆیشتن</r></p><par n="دەر_ۆ__vblex_iv"/></e>
